District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1209.12

Duties of Advisory Board.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 13, 32 DCR 6334
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(a), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2242.